Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2215
Statement to holder of variable annuity contracts; contents.

A company shall mail to the holder of its variable annuity contracts at least once in each year after the first, at his last-known address, a statement reporting:

(1) The number of units credited to such contract and the dollar value of a unit as of a date not more than two months previous to the date of mailing; and

(2) The investments held in the variable annuity account.

Such statement shall be mailed not more than two months prior to the annual meeting electing the governing board of the separate account when an election of a governing board of a separate account is required.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 15, p. 1265.